src/morphology/affixes/verbs-L2.lexc
LEXICON BORGE_IV !Contracted Impersonal Verbs
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV:%> ContrImpersonal ;
 +V+IV:»j SG3PASS ;
! +V+IV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;  !replaced
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBORGE ;
! +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE ;
! Here I have exchanged Pekka's original BORGE with DOHPPE. DeverbalVerbsBORGE
! was not defined, and since they are deverbal verbs, intransitive impersonal
! BORGE should behave like intransitive personal DOHPPE. TT 020108.
!LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBORGE now up and going. TO 020106

LEXICON BASSO_IV ! Bisyllabic, inherently passive -ot verbs
 +V+IV: OT-PASSIVE-BASSO ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct:»m@C.NeedNoun@ BOAHTALADDAN ;

LEXICON OT-PASSIVE-BASSO
! The first two entries from DOHPPE
! CIRROStem ; !replaced to avoid passive + actio
! +Der4+Der/muš+N+Use/-Spell:»mušš@C.NeedNoun@ MUSH ; !L2
! +Der1+Der/meahttun+Err/Orth+Use/-Spell:»X7#meahttu MEAHTTUN ; !L2
 :»j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ ;
! DOHPPEINCH ; !replaced to avoid passive + actio
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ; ! Der/goah0ti changed to Der/goahti, as 0 is bad in tag
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»šgoah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ; ! ditto
 :%>j jStemsDOHPPE ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>Y5 VSufDOHPPE ;
 +Cond:%>Y5 CondV2 ;
 +Pot+Prs:%>Y5ž PotC ;
 +Imprt:%>Y5 ImprtSg2 ; !Prs
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»Y5me K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»Y5min K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»Y5men K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»Y5n R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen:»Y5ma R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc:»Y5mis K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»Y5mij K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»Y5ma K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mat K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:»Y5mak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/PlGen:»Y5mijd R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijdda K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»Y5mijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijgujn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»Y5mij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijddás%> PxC ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;

 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV2 ;
 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Inf:%>Y5t K ;
 +Actio+Nom:%>Y5n K ;
 +Actio+Gen:%>Y5n K ; ! ! (Re?)introducing?
 +Actio+Ess:%>Y5me K ;
 +Actio+Ess:%>Y5min K ;
 +Actio+Ess:%>Y5men K ;
 +Actio+Loc:%>Y5mis K ;
 +Actio+Com:%>Y5mijn K ;
 :%>Y6 VjStemsDOHPPE ;
! The entry leading to PASSIVE in DOHPPE is omitted here.
! The next entries are the non-passive partS of the DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE entry.
 +Der1+Der/st+V:»st BASSO-MUITAL ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»stalla%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»stadda%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»stas'ti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»steas'ti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+TV:»h BASSO-MUITAL ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»halla%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»hadda%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»has'ti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»heas'ti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/d+V:»d BASSO-MUITAL ;

LEXICON OT-PASSIVE
! The first two entries from DOHPPE
! CIRROStem ; !replaced to avoid passive + actio
! +Der4+Der/muš+N+Use/-Spell:mušš@C.NeedNoun@ MUSH ; !L2
! +Der1+Der/meahttun+Err/Orth+Use/-Spell:»X7#meahttu MEAHTTUN ; !L2
 :j DeverbalNounsDOHPPEJ ;
! DOHPPEINCH ; !replaced to avoid passive + actio
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:goah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ; ! Der/goah0ti changed to Der/goahti, as 0 is bad in tag
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:šgoah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ; ! ditto
 :j jStemsDOHPPE ;
 +Ind+Prs:%>Y5 VSufDOHPPE ;
 +Cond:%>Y5 CondV2 ;
 +Pot+Prs:%>Y5ž PotC ;
 +Imprt:%>Y5 ImprtSg2 ; !Prs
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»Y5me K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»Y5min K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»Y5men K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»Y5n R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»Y5n K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen:»Y5ma R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc:»Y5mis K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»Y5mij K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»Y5ma K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mat K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:»Y5mak K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Nom:»Y5mijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/PlGen:»Y5mijd R ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijd K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijdda K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»Y5mijnna K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»Y5mijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijgujn K ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»Y5mij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Gen:»Y5mijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Acc:»Y5mijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Ill:»Y5mijddás%> PxC ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Loc:»Y5mijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Pl+Com:»Y5mijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV2 ;
 :%>Y5 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Inf:%>Y5t K ;
 +Actio+Nom:%>Y5n K ;
 +Actio+Gen:%>Y5n K ; ! ! (Re?)introducing?
 +Actio+Ess:%>Y5me K ;
 +Actio+Ess:%>Y5min K ;
 +Actio+Ess:%>Y5men K ;
 +Actio+Loc:%>Y5mis K ;
 +Actio+Com:%>Y5mijn K ;
 :Y6 VjStemsDOHPPE ;
! The entry leading to PASSIVE in DOHPPE is omitted here.
! The next entries are the non-passive partS of the DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE entry.
 +Der1+Der/st+V:st BASSO-MUITAL ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:stalla%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:stadda%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:stas'ti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:steas'ti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+TV:h BASSO-MUITAL ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:halla%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:hadda%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:has'ti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:heas'ti%> BOAHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/d+V:d BASSO-MUITAL ;
