src/morphology/stems/verbs-L2.lexc
LEXICON Verb
addjot:addjo BASSO_IV ;
ahttot:ahtto BASSO_IV ;
almmustuvvat+Err/Sub:almmustuvvo BASSO_IV ; ! !XXXThis is wrong
arvát:arvá BORGE_IV ;
balvet:balve BORGE_IV ;
beitot:bejto BASSO_IV ;
belkot:belko BASSO_IV ;
beđđot:beđđo BASSO_IV ;
bigget:bigge BORGE_IV ;
biggot:biggo BASSO_IV ;
bivlot:bivlo BASSO_IV ;
borget:borge BORGE_IV ;
dihttot:dihtto BASSO_IV ;
doddjot:doddjo BASSO_IV ;
dovdot:dovdo BASSO_IV ;
elvot:elvo BASSO_IV ;
fadnot:fadno BASSO_IV ;
festot:festo BASSO_IV ;
firrot:firro BASSO_IV ;
firtet:firte BORGE_IV ;
fállot:fállo BASSO_IV ;
fáskot:fásko BASSO_IV ;
galbmot:galbmo BASSO_IV ;
gefot:gefo BASSO_IV ;
genddot:genddo BASSO_IV ;
gessot:gesso BASSO_IV ;
geđđot:geđđo BASSO_IV ;
giktot:gikto BASSO_IV ;
gildot:gildo BASSO_IV ;
goddot:goddo BASSO_IV ;
gohccot:gohcco BASSO_IV ;
gohččot:gohččo BASSO_IV ;
goksot:gokso BASSO_IV ;
golgot:golgo BASSO_IV ;
golket:golke BORGE_IV ;
gordot:gordo BASSO_IV ;
gullot:gullo BASSO_IV ;
guđđot:guđđo BASSO_IV ;
gáddjot:gáddjo BASSO_IV ;
gáržot:gáržo BASSO_IV ;
gávdnot:gávdno BASSO_IV ;
haksot:hakso BASSO_IV ;
ihttot:ihtto BASSO_IV ;
jallet:jalle BORGE_IV ;
jađgot:jađgo BASSO_IV ;
jađgŋot:jađgŋo BASSO_IV ;
jovgot:jovgo BASSO_IV ;
jábmot:jábmo BASSO_IV ;
jávvot:jávvo BASSO_IV ;
lohkkot:lohkko BASSO_IV ;
láhppot:láhppo BASSO_IV ;
muhttot:muhtto BASSO_IV ;
muktot:mukto BASSO_IV ;
muohttát:muohttá BORGE_IV ;
muvtot:muvto BASSO_IV ;
nagadestot:nagadesto BASSO_IV ;
navválestot:navválesto BASSO_IV ;
njallet:njalle BORGE_IV ;
njeđgot:njeđgo BASSO_IV ;
njirdot:njirdo  BASSO_IV ;
njurdot:njurdo BASSO_IV ;
nohkkot:nohkko BASSO_IV ;
náddjot:náddjo BASSO_IV ;
náitot:nájto BASSO_IV ;
obbot:obbo  BASSO_IV ;
oidnot:oidno BASSO_IV ;
ođđot:ođđo BASSO_IV ;
reitot:rejto BASSO_IV ;
rekčot:rekčo  BASSO_IV ;
restot:resto BASSO_IV ;
ráfot:ráfo  BASSO_IV ;
rátkot:rátko BASSO_IV ;
savvot:savvo BASSO_IV ;
sivlot:sivlo BASSO_IV ;
sordot:sordo BASSO_IV ;
sorrot:sorro BASSO_IV ;
suhččot:suhččo BASSO_IV ;
suđđot:suđđo BASSO_IV ;
sáhttojuvvot:sáhttojuvvo BASSO_IV ; !here because disamb gang wants sáhttit intrans.
bihkkaduvvot:bihkkaduvvo BASSO_IV ;
bivdot:bivdo BASSO_IV ;
buhttejuvvot:buhttejuvvo BASSO_IV ;
sáhttot:sáhtto BASSO_IV ; !here because disamb gang wants sáhttit intrans.
veddot:veddo BASSO_IV ;
virtet:virte BORGE_IV ;
vuhttot:vuhtto BASSO_IV ;
vuhččot:vuhččo BASSO_IV ;
vulgot:vulgo BASSO_IV ;
vuvdot:vuvdo BASSO_IV ;
váfot:váfo BASSO_IV ;
váhččet:váhčče BORGE_IV ;
váldot:váldo BASSO_IV ;
vázzot:vázzo BASSO_IV ;
váŋkot:váŋko BASSO_IV ;
áidnet:ájdne BORGE_IV ;
áššehuvvot:áššehuvvo BASSO_IV ;
čadnot:čadno BASSO_IV ;
šerret:šerre BORGE_IV ;
čestot:često BASSO_IV ;
čidnot:čidno BASSO_IV ;
šlahttet:šlahtte BORGE_IV ;
šlahttát:šlahttá BORGE_IV ;
čoggot:čoggo BASSO_IV ;
šordot:šordo BASSO_IV ;
čovdot:čovdo BASSO_IV ;
čuiket:čujke BORGE_IV ;
čuldot:čuldo BASSO_IV ;
šávdot:šávdo BASSO_IV ;
báitot:báito BASSO_IV ;
heaittihuvvot:heaittihuvvo BASSO_IV ;
sisačálihuvvot:sisa#čálihuvvo BASSO_IV ;
unniduvvot:unniduvvo BASSO_IV ;
áššáskuhttot:áššáskuhtto BASSO_IV ;
giddehuvvot:giddehuvvo BASSO_IV ;
váldesirdot:válde#sirdo BASSO_IV ;
